Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part  of ORS 681.740 to
681.758.
SECTION 2. (1) The Health Licensing Office may issue a license to engage  in the practice
of art therapy as a provisional licensed art therapist to an applicant who:
(a) Is at least 18 years of age;
(b) Has received at least a master’s degree from  a program accepted by the Art Therapy
Credentials Board, Inc., or its successor organization, and approved by the office;
(c) Submits sufficient proof, as determined by the office, of:
(A) As approved by the office by rule, satisfying the  requirements as a provisional reg-
istered art therapist by the Art Therapy Credentials Board, Inc., or its successor  organiza-
tion;
(B) Engagement in a supervisory relationship with a qualified supervisor; and
(C) Being in  good standing in any other states where the applicant is authorized to
practice art therapy; and
(d) Pays a licensure fee.
(2) A provisional licensed art therapist may apply  to the office for a license under ORS
681.743 or 681.746 once the provisional licensed art therapist:
(a) Completes two years of supervised mental health practice, as defined  by the Art
Therapy Credentials Board, Inc., or its successor organization, and approved by  the office
by rule; and
(b) Meets other requirements established by the office by rule.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 681.740 is amended to read:
681.740. As used in ORS 681.740 to 681.758:
(1) “Art therapy” means the integrated use  of psychotherapeutic principles, visual art media and
the creative process to assist clients in increasing awareness of self  and others, coping with symp-
toms, stress and traumatic  experiences, enhancing cognitive abilities and identifying and imple-
menting therapeutic interventions to meet  developmental, behavioral, cognitive and emotional needs.
(2) “Board certified art therapist” means a person who is credentialed by the Art Therapy Cre-
dentials Board, Inc., or its successor organization, as a board certified art therapist.
(3) “Licensed art therapist” means a person who is licensed by the Health Licensing  Office to
practice art therapy under ORS 681.743.
Enrolled House Bill 3761 (HB 3761-A) Page 1
(4) “Licensed certified art therapist” means a person who is licensed by  the office to practice
art therapy under ORS 681.746.
(5) “Practice of art therapy”  means to engage professionally and for compensation in providing
art therapy services that include, but are not limited to:
(a) Evaluation during client sessions;
(b) Using treatment activities that provide  clients with opportunities for expression through the
creative  process;
(c) Using art therapy assessment methods to determine treatment goals and implement
therapeutic art interventions to meet clients’ developmental, emotional and mental needs; and
(d) Employing art media, the creative process  and the resulting artwork to assist clients in
coping with and reducing psychiatric symptoms, including  anxiety, attachment disorders, depression
and post-traumatic stress, enhancing neurological, cognitive and verbal abilities  and promoting ap-
propriate skills development.
(6) “Provisional licensed art therapist” means a person who is licensed by the office to
practice art therapy under section 2 of this 2025 Act.
[(6)] (7) “Registered art  therapist” means a person who is credentialed by the Art Therapy
Credentials Board, Inc., or its successor organization, as a registered art therapist.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 681.743 is amended to read:
681.743. The  Health Licensing Office may issue a license to engage in the practice of art therapy
as a licensed art therapist to an applicant who:
(1) Is at least 18 years of age;
(2) Has received at least a master’s degree from a  program accepted by the Art Therapy Cre-
dentials Board, Inc., or its successor organization, and approved by the office;
(3) Submits sufficient proof, as determined by the office, of:
(a) Having completed two years of supervised mental health practice as a provisional li-
censed art therapist;
[(a)] (b) As approved  by the office by rule, satisfying the requirements to be credentialed as a
registered art therapist by  the Art Therapy Credentials Board, Inc., or its successor organization;
and
[(b)] (c) Being in good standing in any other states where the applicant is [ licensed or certified ]
authorized to practice art therapy; and
(4) Pays a licensure fee.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 681.746 is amended to read:
681.746. The  Health Licensing Office may issue a license to engage in the practice of art therapy
as a licensed certified art therapist to an applicant who:
(1) Is at least 18 years of age;
(2) Has received at least a master’s degree  from a program accepted by the Art Therapy Cre-
dentials Board, Inc., or its successor organization, and approved by the office;
(3) Submits sufficient proof, as determined by the office, of:
(a) Having completed two years of supervised mental health practice as a  provisional li-
censed art therapist;
[(a)] (b) As approved by the office by rule, satisfying the requirements as a board certified art
therapist by the Art Therapy Credentials Board, Inc., or its successor organization; and
[(b)] (c) Being in good standing in any other states where the applicant is [ licensed or certified ]
authorized to practice art therapy; and
(4) Pays a licensure fee.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 681.749 is amended to read:
681.749. (1) A licensed art therapist [ and], a licensed certified art  therapist and a provisional
licensed art therapist  shall comply with the rules adopted by the Health  Licensing Office pursuant
to ORS 681.758.
(2) A licensed art therapist [ or], licensed certified art therapist or provisional licensed art
therapist may, in accordance with that person’s  education and training, administer and use appro-
Enrolled House Bill 3761 (HB 3761-A) Page 2
priate assessment instruments to measure and treat a  client’s affective, behavioral and cognitive
disorders or problems. A licensed art therapist [ or], licensed certified  art therapist or provisional
licensed art therapist  shall refer a  client who presents with a disorder or problem that is beyond
the education and training of the  licensed  art [ therapist’s or ] therapist,  licensed certified art
[therapist’s education and training ] therapist or provisional licensed art therapist  to  a licensed
health care practitioner qualified to treat that disorder or problem.
(3) A licensed art therapist [ or], licensed certified art therapist or provisional licensed art
therapist may  [ not] perform psychological or other assessments or testing designed to diagnose or
measure mental illness only if the licensed art therapist, licensed certified art therapist or
provisional licensed art therapist has formal training regarding the assessment or test, in-
cluding in the performance, use and ethical administration of the assessment or test  and the
interpretation of the results of the assessment or test .
SECTION 7.  ORS 681.752 is amended to read:
681.752. (1) A person may not engage in the  practice of art therapy, purport to be engaged in
the practice of art therapy or use a title, word  or abbreviation, including “art therapist,” to indicate
or imply that the person is authorized or qualified to engage in the practice  of art therapy unless
the person is licensed under ORS 681.743 or 681.746  or section 2 of this 2025 Act .
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to:
(a) The practice of  art therapy as an integral part of a supervised course of study in art therapy;
(b) A person who holds a master’s  degree in art therapy and who is engaged in the practice of
art therapy under  supervision as part of clinical training to fulfill the supervised experience re-
quirement to be credentialed as a registered art therapist;
(c) A person licensed under the laws of this state in a profession or  occupation other than art
therapy who uses art in a manner incidental to the person’s practice;
(d) A person who has training and national certification that attest to  the person’s preparation
and ability and who practices the profession or occupation in which  the person is certified, if the
person does not represent that the person is an art therapist;
(e) A person who is employed by a state, local or federal government agency or by a  community
mental health program or drug and  alcohol treatment program authorized by this state, if the person
provides services within  the person’s scope of employment and the person does not use the term
“art therapy” in connection with the services; or
(f) A person who is authorized by this state to provide mental health services  if the person
provides those services within the person’s authorized scope of practice and does not use  the title
“art therapist” in connection with the services.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 681.758 is amended to read:
681.758. The Health Licensing Office shall adopt rules to:
(1) Establish a process for issuing licenses under ORS 681.743 and 681.746  and section 2 of this
2025 Act;
(2) Establish  licensure fees for licenses issued under ORS 681.743 and 681.746  and section 2 of
this 2025 Act ;
(3) Determine qualifications for applicants for initial licensure,  license renewal and licensure
by reciprocity for licenses under ORS 681.743 and 681.746 and section 2 of this 2025 Act ;
(4) Develop and maintain a  publicly available record of licensed art therapists [ and], licensed
certified art therapists  and provisional licensed art therapists ; and
(5) Establish  standards of professional practice and standards of ethical conduct for licensed art
therapists [ and], licensed certified art therapists and provisional licensed art therapists  that take
into consideration  the code of ethics, conduct and disciplinary procedures of the Art Therapy Cre-
dentials Board, Inc., or its successor organization.
SECTION 9.
Section 10 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 414.
SECTION 10. (1) As used in this section, “licensed art therapist,” “licensed  certified art
therapist” and “provisional licensed  art therapist” have the meanings given those terms in
ORS 681.740.
Enrolled House Bill 3761 (HB 3761-A) Page 3
(2) The Oregon Health Authority and a coordinated care organization shall provide  re-
imbursement in  the state’s medical assistance program for the cost of behavioral health
services provided by licensed art therapists, licensed certified  art therapists and provisional
licensed art therapists.
SECTION 11. The amendments to ORS 681.743 and 681.746 by sections 4 and 5 of this  2025
Act apply to individuals who apply for licensure under ORS 681.743 or 681.746  on or after
January 1, 2028.
SECTION 12. Section 10 of this 2025 Act applies to medical assistance  provided on or af-
ter the operative date specified in section 13 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 13. (1) Sections 2 and 10 of  this 2025 Act and the amendments to ORS 681.740,
681.743, 681.746, 681.749, 681.752 and 681.758 by sections 3 to 8 of this 2025 Act become  opera-
tive on January 1, 2026.
(2) The Health Licensing Office, the  Oregon Health Authority and coordinated care or-
ganizations may take any action before the  operative date specified in subsection (1) of this
section that is necessary  to enable the office, authority or organization to exercise, on and
after the operative date specified  in subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions
and powers conferred on the office, authority or organization by sections 2 and 10 of this 2025
Act and the amendments to ORS 681.740, 681.743, 681.746, 681.749, 681.752 and 681.758 by
sections 3 to 8 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 14.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House April 14, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 20, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3761 (HB 3761-A) Page 4